Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1829.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 240A.03, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 17. new text end new text begin Civil penalties. new text end new text begin Pursuant to section 240A.075, the commission may impose civil penalties of up to $1,000 on individuals who are disruptive or physically interfere with a game organizer, player, or coach during a youth athletic activity. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2028, and applies to acts committed on or after that date. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin [240A.075] DISRUPTING OR INTERFERING WITH A YOUTH ATHLETIC ACTIVITY; CIVIL PENALTY. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) As used in this section, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Official" means a person who serves as an umpire, referee, judge, linesperson, timer, scorekeeper, or in another similar capacity for a youth athletic activity. new text end new text begin (c) "Youth athletic activity" has the meaning given in section 121A.38, subdivision 1, paragraph (e). new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Violations. new text end new text begin (a) The commission may impose a civil penalty of up to $1,000 on an individual who does any of the following: new text end new text begin (1) intentionally enters the field of play and disrupts a youth athletic activity; new text end new text begin (2) intentionally causes any object to enter the field of play if that object disrupts a youth athletic activity; or new text end new text begin (3) assaults or physically interferes with an official, game organizer, player, or coach involved in a youth athletic activity: new text end new text begin (i) while the youth athletic activity is taking place; new text end new text begin (ii) on the premises or in the parking lot where the youth athletic activity is taking place; or new text end new text begin (iii) while the official, game organizer, player, or coach is traveling between the premises where the youth athletic activity is taking place and a public transit stop or a motor vehicle. new text end new text begin (b) Paragraph (a) does not apply to an official, player, or coach participating in a youth athletic activity; any person providing medical assistance to an official, player, or coach; or any person who reasonably believes that action is necessary to prevent or address an emergency. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Youth officiating program grants. new text end new text begin (a) The youth officiating account is established in the special revenue fund. All civil penalties collected under this section shall be deposited into the account and are annually appropriated to the commission to be distributed as provided in paragraph (b). new text end new text begin (b) The commission shall use money in the youth officiating account to develop youth officiating programs or award grants to organizations to develop those programs. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Notification. new text end new text begin (a) If the board of directors of the Minnesota State High School League or a school board exclude any person from attending interscholastic athletic activities pursuant to section 128C.08, the board of directors of the Minnesota State High School League or school board shall notify the commission of that action. new text end new text begin (b) Any official, game organizer, coach, or school principal who witnessed an act that would constitute a violation of subdivision 2 may notify the commission of the violation. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Hearing. new text end new text begin A person on whom a civil penalty is imposed is entitled to a hearing provided the person makes a written request for a hearing within 15 days of receipt of notice of the penalty. Failure to request a hearing shall result in forfeiture of the right to a hearing. Upon request for a hearing, a hearing officer, who shall not be an employee of the commission, shall be appointed by the commission, and the hearing officer shall promptly schedule a hearing on the matter, giving at least ten days' notice of the date, time, and place of the hearing to the person subject to the civil penalty. The hearing and review thereof shall be in accordance with the relevant provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2028, and applies to acts committed on or after that date. new text end